Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2106
City council, village board, county board, or tribal government; resolution to establish zone.

A city council, village board, county board, or tribal government may propose the creation of one or more enterprise zones by adopting a resolution of intention to establish a zone or zones. The resolution shall contain a description of the boundaries of the zone or zones, the time and place of a hearing to be held by the city council, village board, county board, or tribal government, a basic summary of the information to be provided to the department as specified in section 13-2104, and such other additional information as the proposing body may desire to include.

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 725, § 7.